Utah statutes.
41-22-12.5.   Restrictions on use of privately-owned lands without
permission -- Unlawful for person to tamper with signs or fencing on
privately-owned land.
(1) (a)  A person may not operate or accompany a person operating a motor
vehicle on privately-owned land of any other person, firm, or corporation
without permission from the owner or person in charge.
(b)  A person operating or accompanying a person operating a motor vehicle may
not refuse to immediately leave private land upon request of the owner or
person in charge of the land.
(c)  Subsections (1)(a) and (b) do not apply to prescriptive easements on
privately owned land.
(d)  A person who violates Subsection (1)(a) or (b) is guilty of a class C
misdemeanor.
(e)  As part of any sentence for a conviction of a violation of Subsection
(1)(a) or (b), the court may:
(i)  impose a fine of not more than $150;
(ii)  require the person to pay restitution not to exceed $500 for any damage
caused by the unlawful motor vehicle travel; and
(iii)  require the person to perform community service in the form of
repairing any damage caused by the unlawful motor vehicle travel.
(2)  A person operating or accompanying a person operating a motor vehicle may
not obstruct an entrance or exit to private property without the owner's
permission.
(3)  A person may not:
(a)  tear down, mutilate, or destroy any sign, signboards, or other notice
which regulates trespassing for purposes of operating a motor vehicle on land;
or
(b)  tear down, deface, or destroy any fence or other enclosure or any gate or
bars belonging to the fence or enclosure.
